Georgia statutes. TITLE 49 Social Services
Article 1 General Provisions

49-9-1.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the term or terms:

“Agency” means the Georgia Vocational Rehabilitation Agency created pursuant to Code Section 49-9-4.

“Blind person” means a person who has:

Not more than 20/200 central visual acuity in the better eye after correction; or

An equally disabling loss of the visual field.

“Board” means the Georgia Vocational Rehabilitation Services Board created pursuant to Code Section 49-9-2.

“Director” means the agency executive director appointed pursuant to Code Section 49-9-3.

“Disability to employment” means a physical or mental condition which constitutes, contributes to, or, if not corrected, will probably result in an impairment of occupational performance.

“Occupational license” means any license, permit, or other written authority required by any governmental unit to be obtained in order to engage in an occupation.

“Person with disabilities” means an individual having a physical or mental impairment that substantially limits one or more of the major life activities.

“Prosthetic appliance” means any artificial device necessary to support or take the place of a part of the body or to increase the acuity of a sense organ.

“Regulations” means regulations made by the director with the approval of the board and promulgated in the manner prescribed by law.

“Rehabilitation center” means a facility operated for the purpose of assisting in the rehabilitation of persons with disabilities which provides one or more of the following types of services:

Testing, fitting, or training in the use of prosthetic devices;

Prevocational or conditioning therapy;

Physical, corrective, or occupational therapy; or

Adjustment training or evaluation or control of special disabilities; or a facility in which a coordinated approach is made to the physical, mental, and vocational evaluation of persons with disabilities and an integrated program of physical restoration and relating training is provided under competent professional supervision and direction.

“Rehabilitation training” means all necessary training provided to a person with disabilities to compensate for his or her disability to employment, including, but not limited to, manual preconditioning, relating, vocational, and supplementary training and training provided for the purpose of developing occupational skills and capacities.

“Vocational rehabilitation” and “vocational rehabilitation services” mean any service, provided directly or through public or private instrumentalities, found by the director to be necessary to compensate a person with disabilities for his or her disability to employment and to enable such individual to engage in a remunerative occupation.

“Workshop” means a place where any manufacture or handwork is carried on and which is operated for the primary purpose of providing rehabilitative activities, including the use of monetary rewards as an incentive practice for persons with disabilities unable to engage in the competitive labor market. Persons receiving services in workshops shall not be considered as employees of the state for workers’ compensation or any other purposes.

History.

Code 1981, §

34-15-1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 1137, § 1; Code 1981, §

49-9-1

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2012, p. 303, § 1/HB 1146.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, redesignated former Code Section 34-15-1 as present Code Section 49-9-1; added paragraph (1); redesignated former paragraph (1) as paragraph (2); added paragraph (3); deleted former paragraphs (2) and (3), which read:
“(2) ‘Commissioner’ means the Commissioner of Labor.

“(3) ‘Department’ means the Department of Labor.”; substituted “agency executive director appointed pursuant to Code Section 49-9-3” for “official of the division who is charged with the administration of its functions under this chapter” at the end of paragraph (4); deleted former paragraph (6), which read:
“(6) ‘Division’ means the Division of Rehabilitation Services of the Department of Labor.”; redesignated former paragraphs (7) through (14) as present paragraphs (6) through (13), respectively; substituted “director with the approval of the board” for “Commissioner” in paragraph (9); and deleted “, retirement,” following “compensation” near the end of the last sentence of paragraph (13).

49-9-2.
Creation of the Georgia Vocational Rehabilitation Services Board.

There is created the Georgia Vocational Rehabilitation Services Board. The board shall consist of nine members who work or have worked in the area of vocational rehabilitation or who are a part of the vocational rehabilitation community; provided, however, that five members shall be persons with disabilities or family members of persons with disabilities.

The members of the board shall be appointed by the Governor. The first such members shall be appointed by the Governor to take office on July 1, 2012, for initial terms as follows: Three such members shall be appointed for terms of one year; three such members shall be appointed for terms of two years; and three such members shall be appointed for terms of three years. Thereafter, the Governor shall appoint successors upon the expiration of the respective terms of office for terms of three years. All such members shall serve until their successors are appointed and qualified. Such members shall be eligible for reappointment to successive terms of office as members of the board.

Vacancies in office shall be filled by appointment by the Governor in the same manner as the appointment to the position on the board which becomes vacant. An appointment to fill a vacancy other than by expiration of a term of office shall be for the balance of the unexpired term.

Members of the board may be removed from office under the same conditions for removal from office of members of professional licensing boards provided in Code Section 43-1-17.

There shall be a chairperson of the board elected by and from the membership of the board who shall be the presiding officer of the board. The term of the chairperson shall be established by rules of the board.

A quorum for transacting business shall be determined by the members of the board.

The members of the board shall receive a per diem allowance and expenses as shall be set and approved by the Office of Planning and Budget in conformance with rates and allowances set for members of other state boards.

In addition to the powers and duties set forth in this chapter, the board shall recommend to the Governor and the General Assembly changes in state programs, statutes, policies, budgets, and standards relating to vocational rehabilitation services, the improvement of coordination among state and local agencies that provide vocational rehabilitation services, and the improvement of the condition of citizens who are in need of vocational rehabilitation services.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-9-2

, enacted by Ga. L. 2012, p. 303, § 1/HB 1146.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective July 1, 2012.

49-9-3.
Duties of executive director of Georgia Vocational Rehabilitation Agency.

There shall be an executive director of the Georgia Vocational Rehabilitation Agency nominated by the Governor and approved by the board. The director shall serve during the term of the Governor by whom he or she is appointed and at the pleasure of the board. If the Governor’s term expires and the incoming Governor has not made a nomination or such nomination has not been approved by the board, the current director shall serve until a replacement is nominated by the incoming Governor and approved by the board.

In carrying out his or her duties under this chapter, the director of the Georgia Vocational Rehabilitation Agency:

Shall, with the approval of the board, prepare such regulations for promulgation by the board as he or she finds necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter;

Shall, with the approval of the board, prepare such policies and procedures as he or she finds necessary for the purposes of this chapter and establish appropriate subordinate administrative units within the agency;

Shall recommend to the board for appointment such personnel as he or she deems necessary for the efficient performance of the functions of the agency;

Shall prepare and submit to the board annual reports of activities and expenditures and, prior to each regular session of the General Assembly, estimates of sums required for carrying out this chapter and estimates of the amounts to be made available for this purpose from all sources;

Shall make certification for disbursement, in accordance with regulations, of funds available for carrying out the purposes of this chapter;

May, with the approval of the board, delegate to any officer or employee of the agency such of his or her powers and duties, except the making of regulations and the appointment of personnel, as he or she finds necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter; and

Is designated as the administrator of a program provided under Section 221 of the federal Social Security Act, relating to disability adjudication services. The director shall receive, notwithstanding any other provision of law and in addition to his or her regular compensation, such compensation and allowance as may be augmented from grants by the appropriate federal agency in such amount as is determined by the federal agency to be commensurate with the duties imposed by Section 221 of the federal Social Security Act.

History.

Code 1981, § 34-15-3, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 1137, § 1; Code 1981, §

49-9-3

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2012, p. 303, § 1/HB 1146.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, redesignated former Code Section 34-15-3 as present Code Section 49-9-3, and added subsection (a); designated the existing provisions as subsection (b); throughout subsection (b), substituted “board” for “Commissioner” and substituted “agency” for “division”; and substituted “Georgia Vocational Rehabilitation Agency” for “Division of Rehabilitation Services of the Department of Labor” near the end of the introductory paragraph of subsection (b).

49-9-4.
Creation of Georgia Vocational Rehabilitation Agency; function.

The Georgia Vocational Rehabilitation Agency is created and established to perform the functions and assume the duties, powers, and authority exercised on June 30, 2012, by the Division of Rehabilitation Services within the Department of Labor including the disability adjudication section, and such division shall be reconstituted as the Georgia Vocational Rehabilitation Agency effective July 1, 2012.

The Georgia Vocational Rehabilitation Agency shall be assigned to the Department of Human Services for administrative purposes only, as prescribed in Code Section 50-4-3.

On and after July 1, 2012, the powers, functions, duties, programs, institutions, and authority of the Georgia Vocational Rehabilitation Agency relating to the former Division of Rehabilitation Services within the Department of Labor shall be performed and exercised by the Georgia Vocational Rehabilitation Agency pursuant to this article. The Georgia Vocational Rehabilitation Agency shall take all necessary steps to ensure continuity of services for the vocational rehabilitation of persons with disabilities during such transfer.

The agency shall be administered by a director appointed pursuant to Code Section 49-9-3. The policy-making functions which were vested in the Department of Labor pertaining to the Division of Rehabilitation Services are vested in the Georgia Vocational Rehabilitation Agency effective July 1, 2012.

Any proceedings or other matters pending before the Division of Rehabilitation Services of the Department of Labor on June 30, 2012, which relate to the functions transferred to the Georgia Vocational Rehabilitation Agency shall be transferred to the agency on July 1, 2012.

The Georgia Vocational Rehabilitation Agency shall, from July 1, 2012, assume possession and control of all records, papers, equipment, supplies, office space, and all other tangible property possessed and controlled by the Department of Labor as of June 30, 2012, in the Department of Labor’s administration of the Division of Rehabilitation Services. All funds attributable to the Division of Rehabilitation Services and its programs and institutions from state, federal, and any other public or private source shall be transferred to the Georgia Vocational Rehabilitation Agency on July 1, 2012.

On July 1, 2012, the Georgia Vocational Rehabilitation Agency shall receive custody of any state owned real property in the custody of the Department of Labor on June 30, 2012, which pertains to the functions transferred from the Division of Rehabilitation Services to the Georgia Vocational Rehabilitation Agency.

Prior to July 1, 2012, the Office of Planning and Budget shall calculate, in consultation with the Department of Labor, the amount of all funds of or attributable to the Division of Rehabilitation Services and its programs and institutions from any source that are used to provide administrative or other services within the Department of Labor, including funds from the disability adjudication section, the cost allocation system, and any indirect costs funding from the federal government or any other source. The amount calculated shall be transferred to the agency on July 1, 2012.

All officers, employees, and agents of the Division of Rehabilitation Services who, on June 30, 2012, are engaged in the performance of a function or duty which shall be vested in the Georgia Vocational Rehabilitation Agency on July 1, 2012, by this chapter, shall be automatically transferred to the Georgia Vocational Rehabilitation Agency on July 1, 2012. An equivalent number of positions or funds of the Department of Labor which provide administrative support to the Division of Rehabilitation Services shall be transferred to the Georgia Vocational Rehabilitation Agency on July 1, 2012. Such persons shall be subject to the employment practices and policies of the Georgia Vocational Rehabilitation Agency on and after July 1, 2012, but consistent with the compensation and benefits of other employees of that department holding positions substantially the same as the transferred employees; the compensation and benefits of such transferred employees shall not be reduced. Employees who are subject to the rules of the State Personnel Board and who are transferred to the Georgia Vocational Rehabilitation Agency shall retain all existing rights under such rules. Accrued annual and sick leave shall be retained by said employees as employees of the Georgia Vocational Rehabilitation Agency. The Department of Labor shall be responsible for payment of the accrued Fair Labor Standards Act compensatory time possessed by said employees. Such accrued compensatory time shall be used by or paid to said employees prior to July 1, 2012.

The Georgia Vocational Rehabilitation Agency is the designated state unit for the vocational rehabilitation program.

The Georgia Vocational Rehabilitation Agency shall conform to federal standards in all respects necessary for receiving federal grants and the director of the Georgia Vocational Rehabilitation Agency is authorized and empowered to effect such changes as may, from time to time, be necessary in order to comply with such standards.

The Georgia Vocational Rehabilitation Agency shall take all necessary steps to secure at a minimum the same level of benefits provided pursuant to relevant federal statutes and appropriations received by the Division of Rehabilitation Services of the Department of Labor prior to June 30, 2012. The department shall also amend the state plan if necessary to meet federal funding requirements.

The Georgia Vocational Rehabilitation Agency is authorized to employ, on a full or part-time basis, such medical, psychiatric, social work, supervisory, institutional, and other professional personnel and such clerical and other employees as may be necessary to discharge the duties of the agency under this chapter. The agency is also authorized to contract for such professional services as may be necessary.

Classified employees of the Georgia Vocational Rehabilitation Agency under this chapter shall in all instances be employed and dismissed in accordance with rules and regulations of the State Personnel Board.

The Georgia Vocational Rehabilitation Agency shall succeed to all rules, regulations, policies, procedures, and administrative orders of the Department of Labor which are in effect on June 30, 2012, and which relate to the functions of the Division of Rehabilitation Services. Such rules, regulations, policies, procedures, and administrative orders shall remain in effect until amended, repealed, superseded, or nullified by proper authority or as otherwise provided by law.

The rights, privileges, entitlements, and duties of parties to contracts, leases, agreements, and other transactions entered into before July 1, 2012, by the Department of Labor or the Division of Rehabilitation Services pertaining to the Division of Rehabilitation Services transferred to the Georgia Vocational Rehabilitation Agency by this chapter shall continue to exist; and none of these rights, privileges, entitlements, obligations, and duties are impaired or diminished by reason of the transfer of the functions to the Georgia Vocational Rehabilitation Agency. In all such instances, the Georgia Vocational Rehabilitation Agency shall be substituted for the Department of Labor or the Division of Rehabilitation Services, and the Georgia Vocational Rehabilitation Agency shall succeed to the rights, privileges, entitlements, and duties under such contracts, leases, agreements, and other transactions.

The Georgia Vocational Rehabilitation Agency shall conform all service delivery regions to the state service delivery regions provided in subsection (a) of Code Section 50-4-7.

The duties, powers, and authority to manage and operate the long-term acute care and the inpatient rehabilitation hospitals at the Roosevelt Warm Springs Institute for Rehabilitation shall be transferred to the Board of Regents of the University System of Georgia effective July 1, 2015, and the remaining duties, powers, and authority to manage and operate the Roosevelt Warm Springs Institute for Rehabilitation shall remain vested with the Georgia Vocational Rehabilitation Agency.

History.

Code 1981, § 34-15-2, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 1137, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 2-17/HB 228; Ga. L. 2009, p. 745, § 2/SB 97; Code 1981, §

49-9-4

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2012, p. 303, § 1/HB 1146; Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 2-45/HB 642; Ga. L. 2013, p. 141, § 49/HB 79; Ga. L. 2015, p. 890, § 12/HB 263.

The 2012 amendments. —

The first 2012 amendment, effective July 1, 2012, redesignated former Code Section 34-15-2 as present Code Section 49-9-4, and rewrote this Code section. The second 2012 amendment, effective July 1, 2012, in the fourth sentence of subsection (d) (now subsection (g)), substituted “rules of the State Personnel Board” for “State Personnel Administration”, and substituted “such rules” for “the State Personnel Administration”; and substituted “State Personnel Board” for “State Personnel Administration” at the end of paragraph (e)(4) (now paragraph (h)(5)).

The 2013 amendment,

effective April 24, 2013, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, revised punctuation in subsections (d) and (g).

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, deleted “and the Roosevelt Warm Springs Institute for Rehabilitation” following “disability adjudication section” in paragraph (a)(1); and added subsection (l).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-1/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Personnel, equipment, and facilities that were assigned to the State Personnel Administration as of June 30, 2012, shall be transferred to the Department of Administrative Services on the effective date of this Act.” This Act became effective July 1, 2012.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-2/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Appropriations for functions which are transferred by this Act may be transferred as provided in Code Section 45-12-90.”

49-9-5.
Provision of services to persons with disabilities.

The agency shall provide the services authorized by this chapter to persons with disabilities determined to be eligible therefor; and, in carrying out the purposes of this chapter, the agency is authorized, among other things:

To cooperate with other departments, agencies, and institutions, both public and private, in providing the services authorized by this chapter to persons with disabilities; in studying the problems involved therein; and in establishing, developing, and providing, in conformity with the purposes of this chapter, such programs, facilities, and services as may be necessary or desirable;

To enter into reciprocal agreements with other states to provide for the services authorized by this chapter to residents of the state concerned;

To conduct research and compile statistics relating to the provision of services or the need of services by persons with disabilities;

To license blind persons or other persons with disabilities to operate vending facilities under its supervision and control, subject to the terms and conditions provided in regulations, policies, and procedures issued pursuant to Code Section 49-9-3, on:

State property;

County or municipal property;

Federal property, pursuant to delegation of authority under the Randolph-Sheppard Act, 20 U.S.C. Section 107(b), and any amendment thereto or any act of Congress relating to this subject; and

Private property; and

To provide for the establishment, supervision, and control of suitable business enterprises to be operated by persons with disabilities.

History.

Code 1981, § 34-15-4, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 1137, § 1; Code 1981, §

49-9-5

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2012, p. 303, § 1/HB 1146; Ga. L. 2013, p. 141, § 49/HB 79.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, redesignated former Code Section 34-15-4 as present Code Section 49-9-5; in the introductory paragraph of this Code section, substituted “agency” for “department, through the division,” near the beginning, and substituted “agency” for “division” near the end; and substituted “Code Section 49-9-3” for “paragraphs (1) and (2) of Code Section 34-15-3” near the end of the introductory language of paragraph (4).

The 2013 amendment,

effective April 24, 2013, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “under the Randolph-Sheppard Act, 20 U.S.C. Section 107(b),” for “under the Randolph-Sheppard Act (20 U.S. Code, Section 107b)(49 Stat. 1559)” in subparagraph (4)(C).

49-9-6.
Authorization to utilize funds.

The agency is authorized to utilize funds made available from appropriations by Congress, by gifts or grants from private sources, by appropriations of the General Assembly, or by transfer of funds from other state departments for the purpose of establishing and operating rehabilitation centers and workshops.

History.

Code 1981, § 34-15-5, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 1137, § 1; Code 1981, §

49-9-6

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2012, p. 303, § 1/HB 1146.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, redesignated former Code Section 34-15-5 as present Code Section 49-9-6, and substituted “agency” for “Division of Rehabilitation Services” near the beginning of this Code section.

49-9-7.
Cooperation to carry out the purposes of federal statutes.

The agency is empowered and directed to cooperate, pursuant to agreements with the federal government, in carrying out the purposes of any federal statutes pertaining to the purposes of this chapter. The agency is authorized to adopt such methods of administration as are found by the federal government to be necessary for the proper and efficient operation of such agreements and to comply with such conditions as may be necessary to secure the full benefits of such federal statutes and appropriations, to administer any legislation pursuant thereto enacted by this state, to direct the disbursement and administer the use of all funds provided by the federal government or this state for the purposes of this chapter, and to do all things necessary to ensure the vocational rehabilitation of persons with disabilities.

History.

Code 1981, § 34-15-6, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 1137, § 1; Code 1981, §

49-9-7

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2012, p. 303, § 1/HB 1146.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, redesignated former Code Section 34-15-6 as present Code Section 49-9-7; substituted “agency” for “department, through the division,” near the beginning of the first sentence and substituted “agency” for “department” near the beginning of the second sentence.

49-9-8.
Office of State Treasurer designated custodian of federal moneys.

The Office of the State Treasurer is designated as custodian of all moneys received from the federal government for the purpose of carrying out any federal statutes pertaining to the purpose of this chapter. The Office of the State Treasurer shall make disbursements from such funds and all state funds available for such purposes, upon certification in the manner provided in Code Section 49-9-3.

History.

Code 1981, § 34-15-7, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 1137, § 1; Ga. L. 2010, p. 863, § 2/SB 296; Code 1981, §

49-9-8

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2012, p. 303, § 1/HB 1146.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, redesignated former Code Section 34-15-7 as present Code Section 49-9-8, and substituted “Code Section 49-9-3” for “paragraph (5) of Code Section 34-15-3” at the end of this Code section.

49-9-9.
Budget estimates.

Budget estimates of the amount of appropriations needed each fiscal year for vocational rehabilitation services and for the administration of the programs under this chapter shall be submitted by the director to the board and, upon approval by the board, shall be included in the estimates made by the board to the Office of Planning and Budget. In the event federal funds are available to the state for vocational rehabilitation purposes, the Georgia Vocational Rehabilitation Agency is authorized to comply with such requirements as may be necessary to obtain said federal funds in the maximum amount and most advantageous proportion possible insofar as this may be done without violating other provisions of the state law and Constitution. In the event Congress fails in any year to appropriate funds for grants-in-aid to the state for vocational rehabilitation purposes, the board shall include as a part of its budget a request for adequate state funds for vocational rehabilitation purposes.

History.

Code 1981, § 34-15-8, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 1137, § 1; Code 1981, §

49-9-9

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2012, p. 303, § 1/HB 1146.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, redesignated former Code Section 34-15-8 as present Code Section 49-9-9; substituted “board” for “Commissioner” throughout this Code section; substituted “Georgia Vocational Rehabilitation Agency” for “Division of Rehabilitation Services” in the second sentence; and substituted “its budget” for “his or her budget” in the last sentence.

49-9-10.
Accepting and use of gifts.

The director is authorized and empowered, with the approval of the board, to accept and use gifts made unconditionally, by will or otherwise, for carrying out the purposes of this chapter. Gifts made under such conditions as are proper and consistent with this chapter may be so accepted and shall be held, invested, reinvested, and used in accordance with the conditions of the gift.

History.

Code 1981, § 34-15-9, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 1137, § 1; Code 1981, §

49-9-10

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2012, p. 303, § 1/HB 1146.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, redesignated former Code Section 34-15-9 as present Code Section 49-9-10, and substituted “board” for “Commissioner” near the beginning of this Code section.

49-9-11.
Residency requirement; financial need.

Vocational rehabilitation services shall be provided to any qualified individual who is a bona fide resident of the state.

The financial need of eligible persons with disabilities will be considered in the provision of vocational rehabilitation services to the extent allowed by federal or other state law.

History.

Code 1981, § 34-15-10, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 1137, § 1; Code 1981, §

49-9-11

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2012, p. 303, § 1/HB 1146.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, redesignated former Code Section 34-15-10 as present Code Section 49-9-11.

49-9-12.
Independent living program.

The Georgia Vocational Rehabilitation Agency is the designated state unit for the independent living program. The independent living program is authorized to provide or contract for the provision of such services as may be needed to enable persons with disabilities to attain the maximum degree of independent living. The powers delegated and authorized in this Code section for the agency shall be in addition to those previously authorized by any other law. The agency is authorized to cooperate with any federal agency in the administration of such a program.

History.

Code 1981, § 34-15-11, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 1137, § 1; Code 1981, §

49-9-12

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2012, p. 303, § 1/HB 1146.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, redesignated former Code Section 34-15-11 as present Code Section 49-9-12; substituted “Georgia Vocational Rehabilitation Agency” for “Division of Rehabilitation Services of the Department of Labor” in the first sentence; substituted “agency” for “division” in the third sentence; and substituted “agency” for “department” in the last sentence.

49-9-13.
Entitlement to hearing if aggrieved.

Any individual applying for or receiving vocational rehabilitation services who is aggrieved by any action or inaction of the agency shall be entitled, in accordance with regulations, to a hearing in accordance with Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act,” and in accordance with applicable federal laws and regulations.

History.

Code 1981, § 34-15-12, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 1137, § 1; Code 1981, §

49-9-13

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2012, p. 303, § 1/HB 1146.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, redesignated former Code Section 34-15-12 as present Code Section 49-9-13, and substituted “agency” for “division” near the middle of this Code section.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2000, a comma was inserted following “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act”.

49-9-14.
Rights not transferable; exempt from creditors.

Any rights of persons with disabilities to maintenance under this chapter shall not be transferable or assignable at law or in equity and shall be exempt from the claims of creditors.

History.

Code 1981, § 34-15-13, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 1137, § 1; Code 1981, §

49-9-14

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2012, p. 303, § 1/HB 1146.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, redesignated former Code Section 34-15-13 as present Code Section 49-9-14.

49-9-15.
Coverage by a hospitalization or medical insurance policy.

Where a person with disabilities who receives vocational rehabilitation services is covered by a hospitalization or medical insurance policy, the Georgia Vocational Rehabilitation Agency shall be subrogated to the rights of such person with disabilities to recover in an amount not to exceed the cost of vocational rehabilitation services rendered by the Georgia Vocational Rehabilitation Agency, exclusive of those services for which eligibility is not predicated on the need for financial assistance. Where the person with disabilities receives vocational rehabilitation services without disclosing that he or she is covered by a hospitalization or medical insurance policy, he or she shall be liable therefor to the Georgia Vocational Rehabilitation Agency in an amount not to exceed the cost of rehabilitation services rendered, exclusive of those services for which eligibility is not predicated on the need for financial assistance, or in an amount not to exceed the insurance reimbursement received, whichever is the lesser.

History.

Code 1981, § 34-15-14, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 1137, § 1; Code 1981, §

49-9-15

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2012, p. 303, § 1/HB 1146.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, redesignated former Code Section 34-15-14 as present Code Section 49-9-15, and substituted “Georgia Vocational Rehabilitation Agency” for “Division of Rehabilitation Services” throughout this Code section.

49-9-16.
Lien upon causes of actions; procedure for perfecting lien; notice; fee; releases and covenants not to sue.

Where a person with disabilities who receives vocational rehabilitation services is entitled to recover damages for said injuries, the Georgia Vocational Rehabilitation Agency shall have a lien, in an amount not to exceed the cost of rehabilitation services rendered, upon any and all causes of action accruing to the individual to whom such services were furnished, or to the legal representative of such individual, on account of injuries giving rise to such cause of action and which necessitated such rehabilitation services, subject, however, to any attorney’s lien. In order to perfect such lien, the Georgia Vocational Rehabilitation Agency shall file in the office of the clerk of the superior court of the county wherein the individual resides a verified statement setting forth the name and address of such individual; the name and address of the Georgia Vocational Rehabilitation Agency; the amount claimed to be due for such vocational rehabilitation services; and, to the best of claimant’s knowledge, the names and addresses of all persons, firms, or corporations claimed by such injured individual, or the legal representative of such individual, to be liable for damages arising from such injuries. The Georgia Vocational Rehabilitation Agency shall also, within one day after the filing of such claim or lien, mail a copy thereof to any person, firm, or corporation so claimed to be liable for such damages to the addresses as given in such statement. The filing of such claim or lien shall be notice thereof to all persons, firms, or corporations liable for such damages, whether or not they are named in such claim or lien. The clerk of the court shall endorse thereon the date and hour of filing in the hospital lien book, along with the name of the claimant, the injured person, the amount claimed, and the names and addresses of those claimed to be liable for damages. Such information shall be recorded in the name of the injured individual. The clerk shall be paid $1.00 as his or her fee for such filing. No release for such cause or causes of action or any judgment thereon, or any covenant not to sue thereon, shall be valid or effectual as against such lien unless the holder thereof shall join therein or execute a release of such lien; and the claimant of such lien may enforce the lien by an action against the person, firm, or corporation liable for such damages.

History.

Code 1981, § 34-15-15, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 1137, § 1; Code 1981, §

49-9-16

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2012, p. 303, § 1/HB 1146.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, redesignated former Code Section 34-15-15 as present Code Section 49-9-16; substituted “Georgia Vocational Rehabilitation Agency” for “Division of Rehabilitation Services” throughout this Code section; deleted a comma following “individual resides” near the middle of the second sentence; and inserted “or her” in the next to the last sentence.

49-9-17.
Authorization to retain title; authorization to sell; surplus; receipts; deposit of funds received.

The agency is authorized to retain title to any property, tools, instruments, training supplies, equipment, or other items of value acquired for use of persons with disabilities and to repossess and transfer them for the use of other persons with disabilities. The board is authorized to offer for sale any items acquired in the operation of the program under this chapter when they are no longer necessary or to exchange them for necessary items which may be used to greater advantage. When any such surplus equipment is sold or exchanged, a receipt for it shall be taken from the purchaser showing the consideration given for such equipment and shall be forwarded to the Office of the State Treasurer; and any funds received by the agency pursuant to any such transactions shall be deposited in the state treasury in the appropriate federal or state rehabilitation account and shall be available for expenditures for any purposes consistent with this chapter.

History.

Code 1981, § 34-15-16, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 1137, § 1; Ga. L. 2010, p. 863, § 2/SB 296; Code 1981, §

49-9-17

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2012, p. 303, § 1/HB 1146.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, redesignated former Code Section 34-15-16 as present Code Section 49-9-17; substituted “agency” for “division” in the first and third sentences, and substituted “board” for “Commissioner” near the beginning of the second sentence.

49-9-18.
Confidentiality; penalty.

It shall be unlawful, except for purposes directly connected with the administration of the vocational rehabilitation program and in accordance with regulations, policies, and procedures, for any person or persons to solicit, disclose, receive, or make use of or authorize, knowingly permit, participate in, or acquiesce in the use of any list of, or names of, or any information concerning persons applying for or receiving vocational rehabilitation, directly or indirectly derived from the records. Any person who violates any provision of this Code section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1981, § 34-15-17, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 1137, § 1; Code 1981, §

49-9-18

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2012, p. 303, § 1/HB 1146.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, redesignated former Code Section 34-15-17 as present Code Section 49-9-18.

49-9-19.
Governing prohibitions.

Employees of the agency engaged in functions under this chapter shall be governed by the prohibitions in the rules and regulations of the State Personnel Board and the federal Office of Personnel Management from participation in political activity.

History.

Code 1981, § 34-15-18, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 1137, § 1; Code 1981, §

49-9-19

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2012, p. 303, § 1/HB 1146.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, redesignated former Code Section 34-15-18 as present Code Section 49-9-19, and substituted “agency” for “department” near the beginning of this Code section.

49-9-20.
Rights of General Assembly to amend or repeal chapter.

The General Assembly reserves the right to amend or repeal all or any part of this chapter at any time, and there shall be no vested private right of any kind against such amendment or repeal. All the rights, privileges, or immunities conferred by this chapter or by acts done pursuant thereto shall exist subject to the power of the legislature to amend or repeal this chapter at any time.

History.

Code 1981, § 34-15-19, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 1137, § 1; Code 1981, §

49-9-20

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2012, p. 303, § 1/HB 1146.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, redesignated former Code Section 34-15-19 as present Code Section 49-9-20.